Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Penalties

40.990.
Penalties.

Any person who charges or collects or attempts to charge or collect, either directly or indirectly, any fee or other compensation for assisting in any manner a person seeking to obtain payment of a veterans’ bonus shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; but this provision is not intended to prohibit:

Collection by public officers of statutory fees for providing authenticated copies of public records; or

Collection by notaries public of not exceeding fifty cents ($0.50) for administering an oath and giving a certificate thereof; or

The giving of assistance or advice to claimants by any bona fide veterans’ organization, civic organization, institution, public or private body, or person, through one (1) or more persons compensated from the funds of such organization, institution, or public or private body or person, if no fee or charge therefor is collected from the asserted claimant.

Whoever makes any false or fraudulent statement of a material fact in any application, affidavit, certificate, or document submitted or tendered for the purpose of obtaining payment of a veterans’ bonus under this chapter shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any persons conspiring to obtain payment of a fraudulent claim for a veterans’ bonus, or conspiring to defraud one (1) who receives payment or has a bona fide claim for payment of a veterans’ bonus, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, §§ 17 to 19, effective February 20, 1960; 1992, ch. 463, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

40.991.
Penalties for violation of laws relating to bonus paid veterans defined in KRS 40.400.

Any person who charges or collects or attempts to charge or collect, either directly or indirectly, any fee or other compensation for assisting in any manner a person seeking to obtain payment of a bonus under KRS

40.410

to

40.560

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; but this provision is not intended to prohibit:

Collection by public officers of statutory fees for providing authenticated copies of public records; or

The giving of assistance or advice to claimants by any bona fide veterans’ organization, civic organization, institution, public or private body, or person, through one (1) or more persons compensated from the funds of such organization, institution, or public or private body or person, if no fee or charge therefor is collected from the asserted claimant.

Whoever makes any false or fraudulent statement of a material fact in any application, affidavit, certificate, or document submitted or tendered for the purpose of obtaining payment of a bonus under KRS

40.410

to

40.560

, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person conspiring to obtain payment of a fraudulent claim for a bonus under KRS

40.410

to

40.560

, or conspiring to defraud one who receives payment or has a bona fide claim for payment of a bonus, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person convicted of any offense denounced in this section shall forfeit his right, if any, to receive any payment authorized by KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, §§ 17-20; 1992, ch. 463, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see KRS

532.020

.